src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_KUEʹHTT !!=	     * @CODE@ kueʹhtt:kuâhtt
:%^PALE%^PAL SG-NOM ;
:%^PALE%^PAL SG-ACC ; !!= * @CODE@ Num+Sg+Acc: kueʹhtt
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2IY SG-ABE ; !!= * @CODE@ Num+Sg+Gen: kueiʹt
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2IY SG-GEN ; !!= * @CODE@ Num+Sg+Gen: kueiʹt
:%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ Num+Sg+Ill: kuâhtta
+Use/NG:%>e SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ Num+Sg+Ill: kueʹhtte
!! WORK NEEDED
LEXICON N_KUEʹLL !!= * @CODE@ kueʹll:kuâll
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_KUEʹLL ;
LEXICON NMN_KUEʹLL
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant and Geminate variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Dim
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(1) Sg.Nom: kueʹll
!! !!(2) Pl.Nom: kueʼl
!! !!(3) Sg.Ill: kuâlˈla
!! !!(4) Sg.Loc: kueʹlest
!! !!(5) Sg.Com: kuõʹlin ~ kueʹlin
!! !!(6) Ess: kueʹllen
!! !!(7) Par: kueʹlled
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: kuõʹlid ~ kueʹlid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: kuâlaž 
!! ** Yaml: __N-kuell__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * kueʹll:kuâll
:%^CC2CCC NMN_SG-ILL_A ;
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C DenominalAdjsCShort ;

:%^PALE%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^PALE%^PAL SG-NOM ;
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;
+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;
:%^PALE%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without

:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C PL-OBL ;
+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C PL-OBL ;
+Der/Dimin:%^VOWLower%^CC2C N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_KUEʹSˈS !!= * @CODE@ kueʹsˈs:kuâsˈs
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_KUEʹSˈS ;
LEXICON NMN_KUEʹSˈS
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant and Geminate variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Dim
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(5) Sg.Com: kuõʹssin ~ kueʹssin
!! !!(6) Ess: kueʹsˈsen
!! !!(7) Par: kueʹsˈsed
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: kuõʹssid ~ kueʹssid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: kuâssaž 
!! ** Yaml: __N-kuell__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * kueʹsˈs:kuâsˈs
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) kuâsˈsa
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC DenominalAdjsCShort ; !!= * @CODE@

:%^PALE%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) kueʹsˈs
:%^PALE%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) kueʹsˈs
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) kueʹss
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) kueʹss
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) kueʹssest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CCC2CC SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) kuõʹssin
+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ kueʹssin
:%^PALE%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;  !!= * @CODE@ (6) kueʹsˈsen
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) kuõʹssid
+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ kueʹssid
:%^CCC2CC E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) kuâssaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) kuâsˈs-
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) kueʹss-

LEXICON N_MIEʹLˈL !!= * @CODE@ mieʹll:meâlˈl
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_MIEʹLˈL ;
LEXICON NMN_MIEʹLˈL
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant and Geminate variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Dim
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(5) Sg.Com: miõʹllin ~ mieʹllin
!! !!(6) Ess: mieʹlˈlen
!! !!(7) Par: mieʹlˈled
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: miõʹllid ~ mieʹllid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: meâllaž 
!! ** Yaml: __N-kuell__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * mieʹll:meâlˈl
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) meâlˈla
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC DenominalAdjsCShort ; !!= * @CODE@

:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) mieʹlˈl
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) mieʹlˈl
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) mieʹll
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) mieʹll
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) mieʹllest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CCC2CC SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) miõʹllin
+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ mieʹllin
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;  !!= * @CODE@ (6) mieʹlˈlen
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) miõʹllid
+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ mieʹllid
:%^CCC2CC E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) meâllaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) meâlˈl-
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) mieʹll-

LEXICON N_SUEIʹNN !!= * @CODE@ sueiʹnn:sueiʹnn
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_SUEIʹNN ;
LEXICON NMN_SUEIʹNN
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(1) Sg.Nom: sueiʹnn
!! !!(2) Pl.Nom: sueiʼn
!! !!(3) Sg.Ill: sueinna
!! !!(4) Sg.Loc: sueiʹnest
!! !!(5) Sg.Com: sueiʹnin
!! !!(6) Ess: sueiʹnnen
!! !!(7) Par: sueiʹnned
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: sueiʹnid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: sueinaž
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! Is for nouns with ''-est'' Loc, Extra long vowel
!! ** Yaml: __N-sueinn__
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
:%^XYY2XY SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
:%^PALNo NMN_SG-ILL_A ;
:%^XYY2XY%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY SG-COM_IN ;
:%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY%> PL-OBL ;
+Der/Dimin:%^PALNo%^XYY2XY N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_MUEʹRJJ !!= * @CODE@ mueʹrjj:muârjj
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_MUEʹRJJ ;
