src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
cisttkueʹss:cistt#kuâsˈs N_KUEʹSˈS ;
dohatjueʹlǧǧ:dohatjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
haajjsueiʹnn:haajj#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
heäppažsäʹlttsueiʹnn:heäppažsäʹltt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jeäʹǧǧlåʹddmueʹrjj:jeäʹǧǧlåʹdd#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
jeäʹǧǧsueiʹnn:jeäʹǧǧ#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jiõŋŋnueʹtt:jiõŋŋ#nuâtˈt N_KUEʹSˈS ;
johssnueʹrr:johss#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
johsstueʹll:johss#tuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
jokknueʹrjj:jokknueʹrjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
jokkreddsueiʹnn:jokkredd#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jokksueʹrr:jokk#suârr N_KUEʹLL ;
jokkvueʹmm:jokk#vuâmm N_KUEʹLL ;
jueʹtt:juâtt N_KUEʹLL ;
juustõsnueʹrr:juustõs#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
jäuʹrrsueiʹnn:jäuʹrr#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jävvsueiʹnn:jävv#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jävvšõddâmsueiʹnn:jävvšõddâm#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jõnnluhttsueiʹnn:jõnnluhtt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
jõnnvueiʹvvsueiʹnn:jõnnvueiʹvv#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
kauppkueʹll:kaupp#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
kaʹlliluhttsueiʹnn:kaʹlliluhtt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
koođđkueʹll:koođđ#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
mäʹrddkueʹll:mäʹrdd#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
uʹrvvkueʹll:uʹrvv#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
košǩǩeemnueʹrr:košǩǩeem#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
kueʹlbb:kuâlbb N_MUEʹRJJ ;
kueʹmm:kuâmm N_KUEʹLL ;
kueʹpp:kuâpp N_KUEʹLL ;
kuulpâǩnueʹrr:kuulpâǩ#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
kuâlggtueʹllj:kuâlgg#tuâlˈlj N_KUEʹSˈS ;
kuäʹccev-vueʹmm:kuäʹcˈcev-#vuâmm N_KUEʹLL ;
kuõbǯǯsueiʹnn:kuõbǯǯ#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
kuõrggjueʹlǧǧ:kuõrggjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
kuõssvueʹmm:kuõss#vuâmm N_KUEʹLL ;
kuʹvǯǯkueʹll:kuʹvǯǯ#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
kuʹǩesjueʹlǧǧ:kuʹǩesjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
kââmm-mueʹǩǩ:kââmm-#muâkˈk N_KUEʹSˈS ;
käärnõsmueʹrjj:käärnõs#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
käʹǩstemnueʹrr:käʹǩstem#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
kåiʹǧǧrieʹmjj:kåiʹǧǧ#reâmjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
kåʹšǩǩ-kueʹll:kåʹšǩǩ-#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
kåʹšǩǩsueiʹnn:kåʹšǩǩ#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
kõskkvueʹǯǯ:kõskk#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
kõõskâsmueʹrjj:kõõskâs#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
kõʒʒvueʹǯǯ:kõʒʒ#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
luõsskueʹll:luõss#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
läämpajueʹlǧǧ:läämpa#juâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
maaʹlʼjumvueʹǯǯ:maaʹlʼjum#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
meäʹttemlueʹvv:meäʹttem#luâvv N_KUEʹLL ;
mieʹlǩǩrueʹbb:mieʹlǩǩ#ruâbˈb N_KUEʹSˈS ;
molltueʹllj:moll#tuâlˈlj N_KUEʹSˈS ;
mooččâs-sueiʹnn:mooččâs-#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
mosttjueʹlǧǧ:mosttjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
mâʹŋŋjueʹlǧǧ:mâʹŋŋjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
mäddmueʹrjj:mädd#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
naartâlsueiʹnn:naartâl#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
njormmsueiʹnn:njormm#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
njueʹrčč:njuârčč N_MUEʹRJJ ;
njuuʹnnsueiʹnn:njuuʹnn#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
njuõckkvueʹǯǯ:njuõckk#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
njuõrâs-saavvsueiʹnn:njuõrâs-saavv#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
njuõrâs-sueiʹnn:njuõrâs-#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
njuõʹrres-skäʹlǯǯsueiʹnn:njuõʹrres-skäʹlǯǯ#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
noorrâmlueʹvv:noorrâm#luâvv N_KUEʹLL ;
nuõrtimiârnueʹrjj:nuõrtimiârnueʹrjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
nuʹǩǩešsueiʹnn:nuʹǩǩeš#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
obbnnueʹtt:obbn#nuâtˈt N_KUEʹSˈS ;
paaštvueʹǯǯ:paašt#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
parvvkueʹll:parvv#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
peäččjueʹlǧǧ:peäččjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
peʹlljvueʹǯǯ:peʹllj#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
pieʹnnenjuuhčsueiʹnn:pieʹnnenjuuhč#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
pieʹnnesueiʹnn:pieʹnne#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
prääʹzniǩ-kueʹss:prääʹzniǩ-#kuâsˈs N_KUEʹSˈS ;
puäʹcǩǩvueʹǯǯ:puäʹcǩǩ#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
pääʹnnkueʹll:pääʹnn#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
reppjueʹlǧǧ:reppjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
ruõʹpssesmueʹrjj:ruõʹpsses#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
ruʹvddkäʹcǩǩisueiʹnn:ruʹvddkäʹcǩǩi#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
rääʹhhnueʹtt:rääʹhh#nuâtˈt N_KUEʹSˈS ;
rääʹnesluhttsueiʹnn:rääʹnesluhtt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
rääʹnesnjormmsueiʹnn:rääʹnesnjormm#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
rääʹnesnueʹrjj:rääʹnesnueʹrjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
rääʹssnueʹrr:rääʹss#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
rååttsueiʹnn:råått#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
rååʹzzsueiʹnn:rååʹzz#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
saanjueʹlǧǧ:saanjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
saavvsueiʹnn:saavv#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
saimaanueʹrjj:saimaanueʹrjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
seerjueʹlǧǧ:seerjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
seäʹpttkueʹll:seäʹptt#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
sillsueiʹnn:sill#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
siʹlvvsueiʹnn:siʹlvv#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
sokkjueʹlǧǧ:sokkjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
sääʹnnjueʹlǧǧ:sääʹnnjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
säʹlttkueʹll:säʹltt#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
säʹlttvueʹǯǯ:säʹltt#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
sõõrvtueʹllj:sõõrv#tuâlˈlj N_KUEʹSˈS ;
takaiǩeʹddsueiʹnn:takaiǩeʹdd#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
tollrieʹmjj:toll#reâmjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
tonnkueʹll:tonn#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
tuõm-mueʹrjj:tuõm-#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
tyrnnmueʹrjj:tyrnn#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
tääuʹtʼteʹmesvueʹǯǯ:tääuʹtʼteʹmes#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
täʹhttvueʹǯǯ:täʹhtt#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
vanttnueʹrr:vantt#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
veällaikueʹll:veällai#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
veällaivueʹǯǯ:veällai#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
viõʹlǧǧesrieʹmjj:viõʹlǧǧes#reâmjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
vueʹǯǯlueʹvv:vueʹǯˈǯ#luâvv N_KUEʹLL ;
vuåššnueʹtt:vuåšˈš#nuâtˈt N_KUEʹSˈS ;
vuõddâsmieʹll:vuõddâs#meâlˈl N_MIEʹLˈL ;
vuõjjâmjueʹlǧǧ:vuõjjâmjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
vuõpttluhttsueiʹnn:vuõpttluhtt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
zooʹbeltueʹllj:zooʹbel#tuâlˈlj N_KUEʹSˈS ;
äiʹttjueʹlǧǧ:äiʹttjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
čaʹppesluʹhttsueiʹnn:čaʹppesluʹhtt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
čeenäppjueʹtt:čeenäpp#juâtt N_KUEʹLL ;
čuõjjiǩvueʹpss:čuõjjiǩ#vuâpss N_MUEʹRJJ ;
čåuʹddkueʹll:čåuʹdd#kuâll N_KUEʹLL ;
čåuʹjjvueʹǯǯ:čåuʹjj#vuâǯˈǯ N_KUEʹSˈS ;
čõõnnâmnueʹrr:čõõnnâm#nuârr N_KUEʹLL ;
ǩeâll-jueʹlǧǧ:ǩeâlˈl-#juâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
ǩeäʹdǧǧjueʹlǧǧ:ǩeäʹdǧǧjuâlgg N_MUEʹRJJ ;
ǩeʹddmueʹrjj:ǩeʹdd#muârjj N_MUEʹRJJ ;
ǩeʹddsäʹlttsueiʹnn:ǩeʹddsäʹltt#suâinn N_SUEIʹNN ;
